North Dakota statutes. TITLE 57 Taxation
CHAPTER 57-17 Excess Levies in Counties, Municipalities, and Townships [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 439, § 104]

57-17-01.
Governing body may declare tax insufficient. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 13; 1943, ch. 259, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 57-1701; S.L. 1971, ch. 548, § 1; repealed by 2015, sb2144, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

57-17-02.
Election to authorize excess levy of taxes. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 57-1702; S.L. 1971, ch. 548, § 2; 1995, ch. 555, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

57-17-03.
Notice of election. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 13; 1943, ch. 259, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 57-1703; S.L. 1971, ch. 548, § 3; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

57-17-04.
Form of ballot. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 13; 1943, ch. 259, § 8; R.C. 1943, § 57-1704; S.L. 1971, ch. 548, § 4; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

57-17-05.
Vote required to grant authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 57-1705; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective August 1, 2015.

57-17-06.
Limitation of amount of excess levy. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 57-1706; 2007, ch. 509, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.

57-17-07.
Certification of results of election. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 235, § 13; R.C. 1943, § 57-1707; repealed by 2015, ch. 439, § 104, effective January 1, 2015.